Washington statutes.
RCW 38.40.200

Military department capital account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

The military department capital account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the sale of state-owned military department property must be deposited into the account. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for military department capital projects.

[ 2005 c 252 s 1.]